Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Article 3. Medicaid.

§ 43-13-101.
Title of article.

This article shall be entitled and cited as the “Mississippi Medicaid Law.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7290-31; Laws, 1969, Ex Sess, ch. 37, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved October 10, 1969).

§ 43-13-103.
Purpose.

For the purpose of affording health care and remedial and institutional services in accordance with the requirements for federal grants and other assistance under Titles XVIII, XIX and XXI of the Social Security Act, as amended, a statewide system of medical assistance is established and shall be in effect in all political subdivisions of the state, to be financed by state appropriations and federal matching funds therefor, and to be administered by the Office of the Governor as hereinafter provided.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7290-32; Laws, 1969, Ex Sess, ch. 37, § 2; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 39; Laws, 2000, ch. 301, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1999.

§ 43-13-105.
Definitions.

When used in this article, the following definitions shall apply, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Administering agency” means the Division of Medicaid in the Office of the Governor as created by this article.

“Division” or “Division of Medicaid” means the Division of Medicaid in the Office of the Governor.

“Medical assistance” means payment of part or all of the costs of medical and remedial care provided under the terms of this article and in accordance with provisions of Titles XIX and XXI of the Social Security Act, as amended.

“Applicant” means a person who applies for assistance under Titles IV, XVI, XIX or XXI of the Social Security Act, as amended, and under the terms of this article.

“Recipient” means a person who is eligible for assistance under Title XIX or XXI of the Social Security Act, as amended and under the terms of this article.

“State health agency” means any agency, department, institution, board or commission of the State of Mississippi, except the University of Mississippi Medical School, which is supported in whole or in part by any public funds, including funds directly appropriated from the State Treasury, funds derived by taxes, fees levied or collected by statutory authority, or any other funds used by “state health agencies” derived from federal sources, when any funds available to such agency are expended either directly or indirectly in connection with, or in support of, any public health, hospital, hospitalization or other public programs for the preventive treatment or actual medical treatment of persons with a physical disability, mental illness or an intellectual disability.

“Mississippi Medicaid Commission” or “Medicaid Commission,” wherever they appear in the laws of the State of Mississippi, means the Division of Medicaid in the Office of the Governor.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7290-33; Laws, 1969, Ex Sess, ch. 37, § 3; Laws, 1980, ch. 508, § 4; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 40; Laws, 2000, ch. 301, § 2; Laws, 2010, ch. 476, § 70, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 1, 2010).

§ 43-13-107.
Division of Medicaid created; director and other personnel; Medical Care Advisory Committee; Drug Use Review Board; Pharmacy and Therapeutics Committee.

The Division of Medicaid is created in the Office of the Governor and established to administer this article and perform such other duties as are prescribed by law.

The Governor shall appoint a full-time executive director, with the advice and consent of the Senate, who shall be either (i) a physician with administrative experience in a medical care or health program, or (ii) a person holding a graduate degree in medical care administration, public health, hospital administration, or the equivalent, or (iii) a person holding a bachelor’s degree with at least three (3) years’ experience in management-level administration of, or policy development for, Medicaid programs. Provided, however, no one who has been a member of the Mississippi Legislature during the previous three (3) years may be Executive Director. The executive director shall be the official secretary and legal custodian of the records of the division; shall be the agent of the division for the purpose of receiving all service of process, summons and notices directed to the division; shall perform such other duties as the Governor may prescribe from time to time; and shall perform all other duties that are now or may be imposed upon him or her by law.

The executive director shall serve at the will and pleasure of the Governor.

The executive director shall, before entering upon the discharge of the duties of the office, take and subscribe to the oath of office prescribed by the Mississippi Constitution and shall file the same in the Office of the Secretary of State, and shall execute a bond in some surety company authorized to do business in the state in the penal sum of One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00), conditioned for the faithful and impartial discharge of the duties of the office. The premium on the bond shall be paid as provided by law out of funds appropriated to the Division of Medicaid for contractual services.

The executive director, with the approval of the Governor and subject to the rules and regulations of the State Personnel Board, shall employ such professional, administrative, stenographic, secretarial, clerical and technical assistance as may be necessary to perform the duties required in administering this article and fix the compensation for those persons, all in accordance with a state merit system meeting federal requirements.When the salary of the executive director is not set by law, that salary shall be set by the State Personnel Board.No employees of the Division of Medicaid shall be considered to be staff members of the immediate Office of the Governor; however, Section 25-9-107(c)(xv) shall apply to the executive director and other administrative heads of the division.

There is established a Medical Care Advisory Committee, which shall be the committee that is required by federal regulation to advise the Division of Medicaid about health and medical care services.

The advisory committee shall consist of not less than eleven (11) members, as follows:

The Governor shall appoint five (5) members, one (1) from each congressional district and one (1) from the state at large;

The Lieutenant Governor shall appoint three (3) members, one (1) from each Supreme Court district;

The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint three (3) members, one (1) from each Supreme Court district.

All members appointed under this paragraph shall either be health care providers or consumers of health care services. One (1) member appointed by each of the appointing authorities shall be a board-certified physician.

The respective Chairmen of the House Medicaid Committee, the House Public Health and Human Services Committee, the House Appropriations Committee, the Senate Medicaid Committee, the Senate Public Health and Welfare Committee and the Senate Appropriations Committee, or their designees, one (1) member of the State Senate appointed by the Lieutenant Governor and one (1) member of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House, shall serve as ex officio nonvoting members of the advisory committee.

In addition to the committee members required by paragraph (b), the advisory committee shall consist of such other members as are necessary to meet the requirements of the federal regulation applicable to the advisory committee, who shall be appointed as provided in the federal regulation.

The chairmanship of the advisory committee shall be elected by the voting members of the committee annually and shall not serve more than two (2) consecutive years as chairman.

The members of the advisory committee specified in paragraph (b) shall serve for terms that are concurrent with the terms of members of the Legislature, and any member appointed under paragraph (b) may be reappointed to the advisory committee. The members of the advisory committee specified in paragraph (b) shall serve without compensation, but shall receive reimbursement to defray actual expenses incurred in the performance of committee business as authorized by law. Legislators shall receive per diem and expenses, which may be paid from the contingent expense funds of their respective houses in the same amounts as provided for committee meetings when the Legislature is not in session.

The advisory committee shall meet not less than quarterly, and advisory committee members shall be furnished written notice of the meetings at least ten (10) days before the date of the meeting.

The executive director shall submit to the advisory committee all amendments, modifications and changes to the state plan for the operation of the Medicaid program, for review by the advisory committee before the amendments, modifications or changes may be implemented by the division.

The advisory committee, among its duties and responsibilities, shall:

Advise the division with respect to amendments, modifications and changes to the state plan for the operation of the Medicaid program;

Advise the division with respect to issues concerning receipt and disbursement of funds and eligibility for Medicaid;

Advise the division with respect to determining the quantity, quality and extent of medical care provided under this article;

Communicate the views of the medical care professions to the division and communicate the views of the division to the medical care professions;

Gather information on reasons that medical care providers do not participate in the Medicaid program and changes that could be made in the program to encourage more providers to participate in the Medicaid program, and advise the division with respect to encouraging physicians and other medical care providers to participate in the Medicaid program;

Provide a written report on or before November 30 of each year to the Governor, Lieutenant Governor and Speaker of the House of Representatives.

There is established a Drug Use Review Board, which shall be the board that is required by federal law to:

Review and initiate retrospective drug use, review including ongoing periodic examination of claims data and other records in order to identify patterns of fraud, abuse, gross overuse, or inappropriate or medically unnecessary care, among physicians, pharmacists and individuals receiving Medicaid benefits or associated with specific drugs or groups of drugs.

Review and initiate ongoing interventions for physicians and pharmacists, targeted toward therapy problems or individuals identified in the course of retrospective drug use reviews.

On an ongoing basis, assess data on drug use against explicit predetermined standards using the compendia and literature set forth in federal law and regulations.

The board shall consist of not less than twelve (12) members appointed by the Governor, or his designee.

The board shall meet at least quarterly, and board members shall be furnished written notice of the meetings at least ten (10) days before the date of the meeting.

The board meetings shall be open to the public, members of the press, legislators and consumers. Additionally, all documents provided to board members shall be available to members of the Legislature in the same manner, and shall be made available to others for a reasonable fee for copying. However, patient confidentiality and provider confidentiality shall be protected by blinding patient names and provider names with numerical or other anonymous identifiers. The board meetings shall be subject to the Open Meetings Act (Sections 25-41-1 through 25-41-17). Board meetings conducted in violation of this section shall be deemed unlawful.

There is established a Pharmacy and Therapeutics Committee, which shall be appointed by the Governor, or his designee.

The committee shall meet as often as needed to fulfill its responsibilities and obligations as set forth in this section, and committee members shall be furnished written notice of the meetings at least ten (10) days before the date of the meeting.

The committee meetings shall be open to the public, members of the press, legislators and consumers. Additionally, all documents provided to committee members shall be available to members of the Legislature in the same manner, and shall be made available to others for a reasonable fee for copying. However, patient confidentiality and provider confidentiality shall be protected by blinding patient names and provider names with numerical or other anonymous identifiers. The committee meetings shall be subject to the Open Meetings Act (Sections 25-41-1 through 25-41-17). Committee meetings conducted in violation of this section shall be deemed unlawful.

After a thirty-day public notice, the executive director, or his or her designee, shall present the division’s recommendation regarding prior approval for a therapeutic class of drugs to the committee. However, in circumstances where the division deems it necessary for the health and safety of Medicaid beneficiaries, the division may present to the committee its recommendations regarding a particular drug without a thirty-day public notice. In making that presentation, the division shall state to the committee the circumstances that precipitate the need for the committee to review the status of a particular drug without a thirty-day public notice. The committee may determine whether or not to review the particular drug under the circumstances stated by the division without a thirty-day public notice. If the committee determines to review the status of the particular drug, it shall make its recommendations to the division, after which the division shall file those recommendations for a thirty-day public comment under Section 25-43-7(1).

Upon reviewing the information and recommendations, the committee shall forward a written recommendation approved by a majority of the committee to the executive director, or his or her designee. The decisions of the committee regarding any limitations to be imposed on any drug or its use for a specified indication shall be based on sound clinical evidence found in labeling, drug compendia, and peer reviewed clinical literature pertaining to use of the drug in the relevant population.

Upon reviewing and considering all recommendations including recommendations of the committee, comments, and data, the executive director shall make a final determination whether to require prior approval of a therapeutic class of drugs, or modify existing prior approval requirements for a therapeutic class of drugs.

At least thirty (30) days before the executive director implements new or amended prior authorization decisions, written notice of the executive director’s decision shall be provided to all prescribing Medicaid providers, all Medicaid enrolled pharmacies, and any other party who has requested the notification. However, notice given under Section 25-43-7(1) will substitute for and meet the requirement for notice under this subsection.

Members of the committee shall dispose of matters before the committee in an unbiased and professional manner. If a matter being considered by the committee presents a real or apparent conflict of interest for any member of the committee, that member shall disclose the conflict in writing to the committee chair and recuse himself or herself from any discussions and/or actions on the matter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7290-34; Laws, 1969, Ex Sess, ch. 37, § 4; Laws, 1973, ch. 312, § 1; Laws, 1980, ch. 560, § 10; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 41; Laws, 2000, ch. 301, § 3; Laws, 2000, ch. 498, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 304, § 4; Laws, 2003, ch. 543, § 4; Laws, 2004, ch. 593, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 553, § 1; brought forward without change, Laws, 2008, ch. 360, § 1; Laws, 2009, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 118, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 530, § 1; Laws, 2013, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 1; Laws, 2015, ch. 473, § 1; Laws, 2017, ch. 304, § 1; Laws, 2017, ch. 408, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 43-13-109.
Rules and regulations for procurement of employees.

The director, with the approval of the governor and pursuant to the rules and regulations of the state personnel board, may adopt reasonable rules and regulations to provide for an open, competitive or qualifying examination for all employees of the division other than the director, part-time consultants and professional staff members.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7290-35; Laws, 1969, Ex Sess, ch. 37, § 5; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 42, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§ 43-13-111.
Budgets of state health agencies.

Every state health agency, as defined in Section 43-13-105, shall obtain an appropriation of state funds from the state Legislature for all medical assistance programs rendered by the agency and shall organize its programs and budgets in such a manner as to secure maximum federal funding through the Division of Medicaid under Title XIX or Title XXI of the federal Social Security Act, as amended.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7290-36; Laws, 1969, Ex Sess, ch. 37, § 6; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 44; Laws, 2000, ch. 301, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1999.

§ 43-13-113.
Receipt and disbursement of funds; contingency plan; contracting for donated dental services program.

The State Treasurer shall receive on behalf of the state, and execute all instruments incidental thereto, federal and other funds to be used for financing the medical assistance plan or program adopted pursuant to this article, and place all such funds in a special account to the credit of the Governor’s Office-Division of Medicaid, which funds shall be expended by the division for the purposes and under the provisions of this article, and shall be paid out by the State Treasurer as funds appropriated to carry out the provisions of this article are paid out by him.

The division shall issue all checks or electronic transfers for administrative expenses, and for medical assistance under the provisions of this article. All such checks or electronic transfers shall be drawn upon funds made available to the division by the State Auditor, upon requisition of the director. It is the purpose of this section to provide that the State Auditor shall transfer, in lump sums, amounts to the division for disbursement under the regulations which shall be made by the director with the approval of the Governor; however, the division, or its fiscal agent in behalf of the division, shall be authorized in maintaining separate accounts with a Mississippi bank to handle claim payments, refund recoveries and related Medicaid program financial transactions, to aggressively manage the float in these accounts while awaiting clearance of checks or electronic transfers and/or other disposition so as to accrue maximum interest advantage of the funds in the account, and to retain all earned interest on these funds to be applied to match federal funds for Medicaid program operations.

The division is authorized to obtain a line of credit through the State Treasurer from the Working Cash-Stabilization Fund or any other special source funds maintained in the State Treasury in an amount not exceeding One Hundred Fifty Million Dollars ($150,000,000.00) to fund shortfalls which, from time to time, may occur due to decreases in state matching fund cash flow. The length of indebtedness under this provision shall not carry past the end of the quarter following the loan origination. Loan proceeds shall be received by the State Treasurer and shall be placed in a Medicaid designated special fund account. Loan proceeds shall be expended only for health care services provided under the Medicaid program. The division may pledge as security for such interim financing future funds that will be received by the division. Any such loans shall be repaid from the first available funds received by the division in the manner of and subject to the same terms provided in this section.

In the event the State Treasurer makes a determination that special source funds are not sufficient to cover a line of credit for the Division of Medicaid, the division is authorized to obtain a line of credit, in an amount not exceeding One Hundred Fifty Million Dollars ($150,000,000.00), from a commercial lender or a consortium of lenders. The length of indebtedness under this provision shall not carry past the end of the quarter following the loan origination. The division shall obtain a minimum of two (2) written quotes that shall be presented to the State Fiscal Officer and State Treasurer, who shall jointly select a lender. Loan proceeds shall be received by the State Treasurer and shall be placed in a Medicaid designated special fund account. Loan proceeds shall be expended only for health care services provided under the Medicaid program. The division may pledge as security for such interim financing future funds that will be received by the division. Any such loans shall be repaid from the first available funds received by the division in the manner of and subject to the same terms provided in this section.

Disbursement of funds to providers shall be made as follows:

All providers must submit all claims to the Division of Medicaid’s fiscal agent no later than twelve (12) months from the date of service.

The Division of Medicaid’s fiscal agent must pay ninety percent (90%) of all clean claims within thirty (30) days of the date of receipt.

The Division of Medicaid’s fiscal agent must pay ninety-nine percent (99%) of all clean claims within ninety (90) days of the date of receipt.

The Division of Medicaid’s fiscal agent must pay all other claims within twelve (12) months of the date of receipt.

If a claim is neither paid nor denied for valid and proper reasons by the end of the time periods as specified above, the Division of Medicaid’s fiscal agent must pay the provider interest on the claim at the rate of one and one-half percent (1-1/2%) per month on the amount of such claim until it is finally settled or adjudicated.

The date of receipt is the date the fiscal agent receives the claim as indicated by its date stamp on the claim or, for those claims filed electronically, the date of receipt is the date of transmission.

The date of payment is the date of the check or, for those claims paid by electronic funds transfer, the date of the transfer.

The above specified time limitations do not apply in the following circumstances:

Retroactive adjustments paid to providers reimbursed under a retrospective payment system;

If a claim for payment under Medicare has been filed in a timely manner, the fiscal agent may pay a Medicaid claim relating to the same services within six (6) months after it, or the provider, receives notice of the disposition of the Medicare claim;

Claims from providers under investigation for fraud or abuse; and

The Division of Medicaid and/or its fiscal agent may make payments at any time in accordance with a court order, to carry out hearing decisions or corrective actions taken to resolve a dispute, or to extend the benefits of a hearing decision, corrective action, or court order to others in the same situation as those directly affected by it.

Repealed.

If sufficient funds are appropriated therefor by the Legislature, the Division of Medicaid may contract with the Mississippi Dental Association, or an approved designee, to develop and operate a Donated Dental Services (DDS) program through which volunteer dentists will treat needy disabled, aged and medically-compromised individuals who are non-Medicaid eligible recipients.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7290-37; Laws, 1969, Ex Sess, ch. 37, § 7; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 45; Laws, 1985, ch. 372; Laws, 1993, ch. 477, § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 614, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 301, § 5; Laws, 2003, ch. 543, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 303, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 22, 2004.).